Utah statutes.
78B-5-321.   Foreign libel judgment.

For the purposes of applying Title 78B, Chapter 5, Part 3, Utah Foreign Judgment Act, to this part, the courts of this state may not make the determination in Section 78B-5-320 unless the person attempting to enforce the judgment submits to personal jurisdiction and the person against whom the judgment is being enforced:

(1)  is a resident of this state;

(2)  is a person or entity amenable to the jurisdiction of this state;

(3)  has assets in this state; or

(4)  may be required to take action in this state to comply with the judgment.

